Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1933
Employer; violation; penalty.

Any employer or prospective employer who violates the provisions of section 81-1932 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 33.